Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-8904
Director; valuation of reserves;
duties; powers.

The
director shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserves for all
outstanding life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts,
and deposit-type contracts of every company issued on or after the operative
date of the valuation manual. In lieu of the valuation of the reserves required
of a foreign or alien company, the director may accept a valuation made, or
caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of any state or other
jurisdiction when the valuation complies with the minimum standard provided
in the Standard Valuation Act.

Laws 2014, LB755, § 4.
July 18, 2014
For operative date of valuation manual, see section 44-8908.